West Virginia, session 2026, SB862.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia:  ARTICLE 15A. ADDICTION TREATMENT PILOT PROGRAM.§62-15A-1. Definitions.[Repealed]. §62-15A-2. The Department of Military Affairs and Public Safety Drug Addiction Treatment Program. [Repealed]. §62-15A-3. Annual reports. [Repealed]. The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home